Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201668-2005
Rules and regulations.

The department
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Children's
Health and Treatment Act. On and after April 1, 2013, the department shall
not apply medical necessity criteria to determine medical necessity for children
under nineteen years of age that have not been adopted and promulgated as
rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2012, LB1063, § 5.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.